Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0877.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 53.8 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,036,915,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 500,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,036,415,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 533,531,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 421,800 Total private revenues 746,000 Total other state restricted revenues 554,349,900 State general fund/general purpose $ (52,634,500) Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 250,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 250,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 250,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) CIVIL RIGHTS OPERATIONS Complaint investigation and enforcement $ 250,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 250,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: EEOC, state and local antidiscrimination agency contracts 250,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 238,586,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 238,586,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 187,845,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 485,000 Total other state restricted revenues 50,256,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Executive direction $ 4,300,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 4,300,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,300,000 Inflation reduction act 3,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) WATER RESOURCES DIVISION Federal ï¿½ Great Lakes remedial action plan grants $ 1,162,000 Great Lakes restoration initiative 6,500,000 Water quality programs 1,331,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,993,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 6,500,000 Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 2,493,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION Environmental cleanup and redevelopment program $ 25,000,000 State sites cleanup program 25,256,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 50,256,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Cleanup and redevelopment fund 25,000,000 State site cleanup fund 25,256,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION Energy programs $ 4,125,000 Material management programs 8,054,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,179,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 1,163,000 Inflation reduction act 8,531,000 Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 2,000,000 Special revenue funds: Private funds 485,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (6) WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Water state revolving funds $ 123,273,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 123,273,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 123,273,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (7) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS PFAS and emerging contaminants $ 39,585,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,585,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 39,585,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 104. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 53.8 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 596,665,900 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 596,665,800 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 274,100 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families (7,624,600) Total other federal revenues 351,447,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 421,800 Total private revenues 261,000 Total other state restricted revenues 309,520,500 State general fund/general purpose $ (57,634,500) (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Coordinated children's healthcare policy and supports $ 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 (3) CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ CHILD WELFARE Adoption subsidies $ (3,486,300) Child care fund 19,234,200 Foster care payments (1,006,200) Guardian assistance program (283,500) Strong families/safe children 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,958,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues (40,900) Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families (8,007,100) Total other federal revenues (21,622,100) Special revenue funds: Local funds - county chargeback 823,400 Private - collections 273,100 Total other state restricted revenues 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 43,431,800 (4) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Family independence program $ 11,846,300 Food assistance program benefits (121,721,100) State disability assistance payments (688,300) State supplementation (215,600) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (110,778,700) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues (121,721,100) Special revenue funds: Child support collections 1,437,000 Public assistance recoupment revenue (258,000) Supplemental security income recoveries (200) State general fund/general purpose $ 9,763,600 (5) LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Contractual services, supplies, and materials $ 1,033,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,033,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 301,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 731,100 (6) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Behavioral health program administration $ (500,000) Family support subsidy 382,500 Michigan clinical consultation and care 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 382,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 382,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (7) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Autism services $ 52,089,900 Behavioral health community supports and services 8,300,000 Certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration 0 Federal mental health block grant 3,000,000 Healthy Michigan plan ï¿½ behavioral health (66,512,000) Medicaid mental health services 25,903,200 Medicaid substance use disorder services (13,849,200) Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 3,600,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,531,900 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues (11,843,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 24,374,900 (8) STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 53.8 Caro Regional Mental Health Center ï¿½ psychiatric hospital ï¿½ adult $ 4,294,600 Center for Forensic Psychiatry 12,719,400 Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital ï¿½ adult 3,601,800 Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital ï¿½ psychiatric hospital ï¿½ adult, children, and adolescents--FTEs 53.8 7,894,400 Walter P. Reuther Psychiatric Hospital ï¿½ adult, children, and adolescents (20,096,200) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,414,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues (10,765,800) State general fund/general purpose $ 19,179,800 (9) HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Domestic violence prevention and treatment $ 195,700 Rape prevention and services 119,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 315,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 315,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (10) LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES Local health services $ 575,000 Violence prevention 3,250,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,825,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 575,000 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 3,250,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (11) FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Dental programs $ 0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 83,000 State general fund/general purpose $ (83,000) (12) CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Children's special health care services administration $ 12,000 Medical care and treatment 14,354,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,366,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 9,373,700 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 12,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 4,981,100 (13) HEALTH SERVICES Adult home help services $ (3,924,400) Ambulance services 96,000 Auxiliary medical services (743,700) Dental services 4,361,300 Federally qualified health centers 30,112,200 Health plan services 408,122,300 Healthy Michigan plan 143,853,300 Home health services 12,614,700 Hospice services 47,744,700 Hospital services and therapy 28,684,600 Integrated care organizations 134,955,100 Long-term care services (48,484,300) Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver (61,126,500) Medicare premium payments (9,281,100) Personal care services (8,900) Pharmaceutical services 47,801,000 Physician services (83,560,700) Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly 19,893,400 School-based services (34,850,800) Special Medicaid reimbursement 4,329,200 Transportation 5,030,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 645,618,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 502,066,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues (401,600) Total private revenues (24,100) Michigan merit award trust fund 12,999,900 Total other state restricted revenues 291,991,800 State general fund/general purpose $ (161,013,900) (14) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Community health screenings $ (5,000,000) Community health screenings 5,000,000 First responder and public safety staff mental health 100 Implementation of maternal health policy changes (299,700) Implementation of maternal health policy 299,700 Medicaid work requirement grant 5,000,000 Underserved healthcare facility project (1,500,000) Underserved healthcare facility project 1,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,100 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 5,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 100 Sec. 105. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,400,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,400,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 1,400,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION Financial institutions evaluation $ 1,400,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,400,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Deferred presentment services transaction fees 1,400,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,300,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,300,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 1,200,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 (2) EMPLOYMENT SERVICES Private and occupational distance learning $ 100,000 Wage and hour program 100 Wage and hour program (100) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Distance education fund 100,000 First responder presumed coverage fund 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) MICHIGAN STRATEGIC FUND Arts and cultural program $ 450,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 450,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: NFAH-NEA, promotion of the arts, partnership agreements 450,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Office of future mobility and electrification $ 1,000,000 State historic preservation office grant program 750,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,750,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State historic preservation, national park service grants 750,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 39,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION Bureau of professional licensing $ 39,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 39,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,849,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,849,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 33,849,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) PARKS AND RECREATION DIVISION Recreational boating $ 165,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 165,600 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Waterways account 165,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) RECREATIONAL LANDS AND INFRASTRUCTURE Fisheries infrastructure $ 7,000,000 Recreational trail repairs and improvements 817,700 Snowmobile trail development and maintenance 1,907,900 State game and wildlife area infrastructure 10,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,725,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection account 17,000,000 Recreation improvement account 817,700 Snowmobile trail improvement fund 1,907,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) WATERWAYS BOATING PROGRAM State boating infrastructure and maintenance $ 10,736,800 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,736,800 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Waterways account 10,736,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Wildlife management $ 3,221,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,221,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection account 3,221,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,724,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 500,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,224,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 7,224,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 (2) LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES Biometrics and identification $ 700,000 Criminal Justice Information Center 1,550,000 Forensic science 1,200,000 Grants and community services 2,774,000 Training operations 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,724,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDT, Michigan justice training fund 500,000 Special revenue funds: Auto theft prevention fund 2,774,000 Criminal Justice Information Center service fees 700,000 Michigan set aside fund 1,400,000 Sex offenders registration fund 150,000 State services fee fund 1,200,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Criminal Justice Information Center service fees 1,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (4) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Personal protection order grants $ 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,000,000 Sec. 110. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,100,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,100,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 100,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,000,000 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT State archives $ 100,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 100,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Gubernatorial transition costs $ 3,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 3,000,000 Sec. 111. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ROAD AND BRIDGE PROGRAMS Local grade separation program $ 40,000,000 Rail grade separation fund (40,000,000) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Local grade separation fund 40,000,000 Neighborhood roads fund (40,000,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION DEVELOPMENT Infrastructure projects authority fund $ (65,000,000) Infrastructure projects authority program 65,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Infrastructure projects authority fund 65,000,000 Neighborhood roads fund (65,000,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 112. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 152,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Selfridge Air National Guard base $ 152,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: State restricted revenues 152,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $502,215,400.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $35,046,600.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Executive direction $ 3,000,000 Water quality programs 1,331,000 Subtotal $ 4,331,000 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICESï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ï¿½ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ CHILD WELFARE Child care fund $ 10,194,100 Foster care payments (10,200) Strong families/safe children 2,800 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE State disability assistance payments $ (21,900) LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Contractual services, supplies, and materials $ 3,000 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Behavioral health program administration $ (1,000) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Autism services $ 16,786,000 Behavioral health community supports and services 31,700 Healthy Michigan plan - behavioral health (6,651,200) Medicaid mental health services 8,548,100 Medicaid substance use disorder services (4,847,200) Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 1,059,200 STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Caro Regional Mental Health Center - psychiatric hospital ï¿½ adult $ 12,900 Center for forensic psychiatry 83,500 Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult 3,300 Southeast Michigan state psychiatric hospital 7,200 Walter P. Reuther Psychiatric Hospital ï¿½ adult, children, and adolescents (17,900) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES POLICY AND INITIATIVES Domestic violence prevention and treatment $ 1,600 LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES Local health services $ 127,100 CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Medical care and treatment $ 38,400 HEALTH SERVICES Adult home help services $ (500) Ambulance services 3,300 Dental services 11,600 Federally qualified health centers 9,715,200 Healthy Michigan plan 21,100 Hospital services and therapy 18,000 Long-term care services (1,753,500) Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver (1,748,800) Physician services (1,019,100) Transportation 118,800 Subtotal $ 30,715,600 TOTAL $ 35,046,600 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must be allocated and expended in a manner consistent with federal rules and regulations. Sec. 204. Funds appropriated in part 1 are subject to applicable federal audit and reporting requirements. Prompt action 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall be taken if instances of noncompliance are identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding. If any instance of noncompliance is identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding, the state budget director shall take necessary and immediate action to rectify it. The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies when an instance of noncompliance is identified. Sec. 205. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026 are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026 and any subsequent financial close out period. Sec. 206. (1) To ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law, the state budget director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section. Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately reappropriated for the following purposes: (a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and safety employees at the department of corrections. (b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and safety employees at the department of state police. (2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and reappropriated under subsection (1). (3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees not later than 10 business days after making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification must include the authorized program under which funds were originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the program or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount reallocated to each program or purpose. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state sites cleanup program must be deposited into the state site cleanup fund from surplus funds in the cleanup and redevelopment trust fund in accordance with section 3e of 1996 PA 384, MCL 445.573e. All funds in the state site cleanup fund are appropriated and available for expenditure to support the implementation of the cleanup of environmentally contaminated sites, in accordance with section 20108c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20108c. (2) As used in this section: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) "Cleanup and redevelopment trust fund" means the cleanup and redevelopment trust fund created by section 3e of 1996 PA 384, MCL 445.573e. (b) "State site cleanup fund" means the state site cleanup fund created by section 20108c of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20108c. Sec. 302. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for environmental cleanup and redevelopment program are designated as work project appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the projects is to provide contaminated site cleanup. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $25,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 303. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for PFAS and emerging contaminants are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to address emerging contaminants in drinking water. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $39,585,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 304. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for executive direction are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support a ports program and implementation of the Michigan maritime strategy. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 305. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for material management programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support the coal combustion residuals program. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $263,000.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 306. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for energy programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide training for residential contractors. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $4,125,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 307. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for executive direction are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support stormwater management in the Ox Creek Watershed. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $1,300,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 308. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for material management programs are designated as a work project 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to replace high-emission vehicles. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $685,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 309. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for material management programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support a SMART manufacturing grant program. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $2,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 310. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for material management programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support a heavy-duty vehicles program. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $4,406,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 311. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for material management programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support food waste reduction. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $700,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 312. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Great Lakes restoration initiative are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support work in the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Detroit and Rouge River areas of concern. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $6,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 313. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for federal - Great Lakes remedial action plan grants are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support Great Lakes remedial action plan grants. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $1,162,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 314. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water quality programs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide grants to municipalities for sewer and stormwater infrastructure projects. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $1,331,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 315. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water state revolving funds are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support drinking water and wastewater large-scale construction projects. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $123,273,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 316. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for state sites cleanup program are designated as work project appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide contaminated site cleanup at state-owned properties. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The total estimated cost of all projects is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $25,256,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 401. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Medicaid work requirement grant shall be used for administrative costs directly associated with establishing systems and processes necessary to implement the work and community engagement requirements and other changes to eligibility determinations or redeterminations required by the 2025 budget reconciliation act, Public Law 119-21. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Medicaid work requirement grant are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to implement the work and community engagement requirements and other changes to eligibility determinations or redeterminations required by the 2025 budget reconciliation act, Public Law 119-21. (b) The work project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated completion cost of the work project is $5,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2030. Sec. 402. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for state restricted Medicaid caseload reserve fund contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this section are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. It is the intent of the legislature that this authorization must only be used to address caseload costs in the traditional Medicaid program and the Healthy Michigan plan. Sec. 403. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for community health screenings, the department shall allocate $5,000,000.00 as a grant to a nonprofit organization that is organized under the laws of this state, is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and is located in a city with a population between 20,000 and 24,000 and in a county with a population between 1,200,000 and 1,300,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census, to conduct community health screenings and to collect and distribute public health data on underserved urban and rural populations, first responders, and veterans, to the department. (2) Funds appropriated for community health screenings are considered work project funds, do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year, and are available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to provide funding for health screenings at no cost to the public in order to reduce 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 health disparities in rural or medically underserved communities. (b) The work project will be accomplished through partnerships with nonprofit agencies. (c) The total estimated cost of the work project is $5,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2030. Sec. 404. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for implementation of maternal health policy changes, the department shall allocate $299,700.00 to implement 2024 PA 256. Sec. 405. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for underserved healthcare facility project, the department shall allocate $1,500,000.00 to a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, to support a pediatric and sedation dentistry clinic. The pediatric and sedation dentistry clinic must serve uninsured and underinsured children and adolescents and eligible adults who have a mental illness, severe emotional disturbance, intellectual developmental disorder, or co-occurring substance use disorder. To be eligible for the funds under this section, the nonprofit organization must meet all of the following requirements: (a) Have a stated mission of providing medical, behavioral, and mental health services, as well as other related support services, to underserved populations in Detroit, Wayne County, and surrounding counties, and throughout Michigan. (b) Have its administrative office located in a county with a population of greater than 1,750,000 and in a city with a population between 109,000 and 111,000 according to the most recent 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 federal decennial census. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for underserved healthcare facility project are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. All of the following are in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support a pediatric and sedation dentistry clinic. (b) The project will be accomplished by a CARF International accredited wellness center. (c) The estimated cost of the project is $1,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 406. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for first responder and public safety staff mental health, the department shall allocate $100.00 for a grant program to support firefighters, police officers, emergency medical services personnel, public safety tele-communicators, local correctional officers, juvenile detention employees, prosecutors, and individuals working on special teams to address crimes such as internet sex crimes, sexual crimes against children, or traffic fatalities suffering from post-traumatic stress syndrome and other mental health conditions. The grant program must primarily provide grants to behavioral health providers and may also include funding to the Michigan crisis and access line established under section 165 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1165, to improve information and referrals for these services. The department shall coordinate and integrate the grant program with the Michigan crisis and access 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 line established under section 165 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1165. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for first responder and public safety staff mental health are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. All of the following are in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the work project is to ensure that first responder and public safety staff who are dealing with post-traumatic stress syndrome and other mental health conditions have access to enhanced mental health services. (b) The work project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracting with vendors, or working with local partners. (c) The estimated cost of the work project is $100.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 501. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for state historic preservation office grant program are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support stabilization and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 rehabilitation of historic properties in rural communities. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $750,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031. Sec. 502. All funds received in the prevailing wage fund created in section 25a of 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1125a, are appropriated for the purposes allowable under 25a of 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1125a. Sec. 503. (1) The one-time funds appropriated in part 1 for office of future mobility and electrification shall be used to further the state's emerging aviation and advanced air mobility sector in alignment with Executive Directive No. 2025-4. Funds may be used for advanced air mobility infrastructure deployment to enable Beyond Visual Line of Sight operations, for efforts that further develop this emerging sector, and workforce development strategies to aid in this industry transition. (2) The office of future mobility and electrification shall collaborate with other state departments, including the department of military and veterans affairs and the department of transportation, on the implementation of this program. As necessary to improve the administration or oversight of any of the dollars appropriated under this part and part 1, the department may adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department to perform the required duties under this section. Any grant money that is awarded to a state department is appropriated in that department for the purpose of the intended grant. (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, federal funds received by the office of future mobility and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 electrification, or another state department or agency, for the purposes of advancing the state's aviation and advanced air mobility sector are appropriated for the purposes outlined in the federal grant award. Unexpended federal funds received under this section may be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year. (4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the office of future mobility and electrification are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support the emerging aviation and advanced air mobility sector. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $1,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Sec. 601. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for wildlife management are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for the project under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support Michigan's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 participation in the Chronic Wasting Disease Research Consortium study. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or grants. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,221,400.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Sec. 651. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for personal protection order grants, $1,000,000.00 must be allocated by the department of state police to reimburse law enforcement agencies for the cost of serving personal protection orders. It is the intent of the legislature that the department ensure that the sum total of grants issued under this section and under section 454(12) of article 16 of 2025 PA 22 not exceed $1,000,000.00. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Sec. 701. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for gubernatorial transition costs are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide for executive office transition costs. (b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,000,000.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 702. Pursuant to section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, there is appropriated from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund created under section 351 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1351, to the Medicaid caseload reserve fund created by section 901 the sum of $200,000,000.00. The annual growth rate of adjusted personal income for the current calendar year was estimated to be less than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating conference. The amount appropriated in this part is less than the maximum allowed under section 352(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352. Sec. 703. Pursuant to section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, there is appropriated from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund created under section 351 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1351, to the HR-1 costs fund created by section 902 the sum of $150,000,000.00. The annual growth rate of adjusted personal income for the current calendar year was estimated to be less than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating conference. The amount appropriated in this part is less than the maximum allowed under section 352(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Sec. 801. (1) Funds from the neighborhood roads fund must be distributed and are appropriated to the local grade separation fund, comprehensive transportation fund, infrastructure projects authority fund, and the state trunkline fund, in accordance with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this part and part 1, and section 13c of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Comprehensive transportation fund" means the comprehensive transportation fund created in section 10b of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660b. (b) "Infrastructure projects authority fund" means the infrastructure projects authority fund created by section 13c of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. (c) "Local grade separation fund" means the local grade separation fund created by section 11i of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661i. (d) "Neighborhood roads funds" means the neighborhood roads fund created by section 13c of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. (e) "State trunkline fund" means the state trunkline fund created by section 11 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661. Sec. 802. At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered and unexpended balance in the neighborhood roads fund not previously allocated under section 13c(5)(a) to (e) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c, remains in the neighborhood roads fund and carries forward and is appropriated to local road agencies and the state trunkline fund according to section 13c(5) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.663c. Sec. 803. (1) At the close of the fiscal year, any unencumbered and unexpended balance in the movable bridge fund remains in the movable bridge fund and carries forward and is appropriated for the purposes described in section 11g(3)(b) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661g. (2) As used in this section, "moveable bridge fund" means the moveable bridge fund created by section 11g of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.661g. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 901. (1) The Medicaid caseload reserve fund is created in the state treasury. The purpose of the fund is to support Medicaid caseload costs that occur at levels above appropriated amounts. (2) Money may be spent from the fund only on appropriation. (3) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 702 or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) As used in this section, "fund" means the Medicaid caseload reserve fund created by subsection (1). Sec. 902. (1) The HR-1 costs fund is created within the state treasury. The purpose of the fund is to support costs that occur as a result of administering or implementing the 2025 budget reconciliation act, Public Law 119-21. (2) Money may be spent from the fund only on appropriation. (3) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 703 or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (4) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (5) As used in this section, "fund" means the HR-1 costs fund created by subsection (1). 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS Sec. 1001. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Selfridge Air National Guard Base must be used to support costs of runway encroachment solutions while complying with air installation compatible use zone program recommendations, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Capital improvements necessary to shift the runway to the north and repair the airfield and nonairfield features of the base and surrounding community impacted by the shift. (b) Infrastructure projects including, but not limited to, roadways repairs, vehicle access to the base and to the museum, stormwater drain and culvert repairs and modernization, force protection features, airfield features, and taxiway extensions. (2) The funds appropriated in part 1 for Selfridge Air National Guard base may be spent only if the state budget director determines that funds sufficient to make necessary improvements to Selfridge Air National Guard base as described under subsection (1) were not appropriated under Senate Bill No. 865 of the 103rd Legislature for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. (3) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Selfridge Air National Guard Base are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support costs of runway encroachment solutions. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $152,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2027. Sec. 1002. (1) The department shall identify 1 or more of the following methods for funding Selfridge Air National Guard Base under part 1: (a) Unobligated work project account balances associated with the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254, or other lapsed account balances determined by the state budget director. (b) Unobligated general fund/general purpose or federal appropriations that are eligible to support Selfridge Air National Guard Base infrastructure improvements. (c) Special obligation bond financing through the Michigan strategic fund created in section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005. (2) The department must make every effort to fully utilize the funding options and available revenues identified in subsection (1). After identifying 1 or more of the funding sources under subsection (1) and amounts available from those funding sources that will be used to support Selfridge Air National Guard Base, the department shall identify any remaining costs. (3) Pursuant to section 352 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1352, there is appropriated from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund created under section 351 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 MCL 18.1351, an amount equal to the amount identified by the department under subsection (2) to support remaining costs for Selfridge Air National Guard Base appropriated in part 1. The annual growth rate for the current calendar year was estimated to be less than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating conference. REPEALERS Sec. 1101. Sections 1964, 1968, and 1977 of article 6 of 2026 PA 22 are repealed. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 878 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.